Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201621-265
Shares held by nominees.

(MBCA 7.23) (a) A corporation
may establish a procedure by which the beneficial owner of shares that are
registered in the name of a nominee is recognized by the corporation as the
shareholder. The extent of this recognition may be determined in the procedure.

(b) The procedure may set
forth:

(1)
The types of nominees to which it applies;

(2) The rights or privileges that the corporation
recognizes in a beneficial owner;

(3) The manner in which the procedure is selected
by the nominee;

(4)
The information that must be provided when the procedure is selected;

(5) The period for which
selection of the procedure is effective; and

(6) Other aspects of the rights and
duties created.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 65.